Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.020

Mode of exercising powers, functions and duties.

The form of the organization and the manner and mode in which cities of the first class shall exercise the powers, functions and duties conferred upon them by law, with respect to their own government, shall be as provided in the charters thereof.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.22.020. Prior: 1911 c 17 s 1; RRS s 8948.]